New Jersey, session 222, S1984.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     On September 11, 2001, armed terrorists hijacked four passenger jets and used them as weapons against the United States to destroy the World Trade Center, damage the Pentagon, and kill more than 3,000 innocent people; and these tragic events have left an indelible mark on the people of this great State and nation. b.    The infamy of the terrorist attack is transcended only by the heroic bravery of police officers, firefighters, emergency services personnel, and other citizens, who responded to the crisis and risked their own lives, health, and safety to either thwart the terrorists' actions or to assist the victims of the attack; and since the terrorist attacks, police officers, firefighters, and emergency services personnel have been called upon to make even greater sacrifices to ensure the safety and security of Americans. c.     All people should be aware of and remember the human carnage and atrocities that occurred on September 11, 2001 and all citizens of New Jersey are urged to remember the innocent victims who perished in the attacks, the bravery of those who rushed to their aid, and the resiliency of the American people. d.    It is fitting and proper for the State of New Jersey to designate September 11 in each year as "September 11 Remembrance Day" in New Jersey. 2.    a.  September 11 of each year is designated as "September 11 Remembrance Day" to honor the memory of those who lost their lives in the terrorist attacks against the United States on September 11, 2001, and recognize those who risked their own lives to assist the victims of those attacks. b.    Local governments as well as patriotic organizations are encouraged to hold public ceremonies on "September 11 Remembrance Day" to salute the contributions of police officers, firefighters, and emergency services personnel to the security and well-being of the people of this State and country and to read the names of innocent victims of their respective communities who lost their lives as a result of the terrorist attacks on September 11. c.     All American and State flags in New Jersey shall be flown at half-staff each year on "September 11 Remembrance Day" in memory of the innocent people and the police officers, firefighters, and emergency services personnel who lost their lives on September 11, 2001. 3.    The students and staff members of each public school in the State shall observe a one-minute period of silence each school year at 10 A.M. on "September 11 Remembrance Day" in memory of those who lost their lives in the terrorist attacks on the United States on September 11, 2001, and in recognition of the police officers, firefighters, emergency services personnel, and other citizens of this State and country who risked their own lives, health, and safety to assist the victims of these attacks. Whenever "September 11 Remembrance Day" falls on a Saturday, a Sunday or a holiday, it shall be observed on the school day closest to September 11. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.